Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2596.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Utility Credit Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Public utility." Any of the following:(1) A person or corporation owning or operating in this Commonwealth equipment or facilities for:(i) Producing, generating, transmitting, distributing or furnishing natural or artificial gas, electricity or steam for the production of light, heat or 1234567891011121314151617 power to or for the public for compensation.(ii) Diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing or furnishing water to or for the public for compensation.(iii) Transporting passengers or property as a common carrier.(iv) Use as a canal, turnpike, tunnel, bridge, wharf and other transportation facilities for the public for compensation.(v) Transporting or conveying natural or artificial gas, crude oil, gasoline or petroleum products, materials for refrigeration, oxygen or nitrogen or other fluid substance, by pipeline or conduit, for the public for compensation.(vi) Conveying or transmitting messages or communications by telephone or telegraph or domestic public land mobile radio service, including, but not limited to, point-to-point microwave radio service for the public for compensation.(vii) Wastewater collection, treatment or disposal for the public for compensation.(viii) Providing limousine service in a county of the second class under 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 Subch. B (relating to limousine service in counties of the second class).(2) The term does not include:(i) An individual or corporation, not otherwise a public utility, that furnishes service only to the individual or itself.(ii) A bona fide cooperative association that 20260HB2596PN3522 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 furnishes service only to its stockholders or members on a nonprofit basis.(iii) A producer of natural gas not engaged in distributing the gas directly to the public for compensation.(iv) A building or facility owner/operator who holds ownership over and manages the internal distribution system serving the building or facility and who supplies electric power and other related electric power services to occupants of the building or facility.(v) An electric generation supplier company, except for the limited purposes described in 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2809 (relating to requirements for electric generation suppliers) and 2810 (relating to revenue-neutral reconciliation).(vi) Service as follows:(A) A water or sewer service provided to independently owned user premises by an individual or corporation that owns and operates as a primary business a resort where:(I) the service provided is from a point within the boundaries of the resort's property and is provided to no more than 100 independently owned user premises for each type of service;(II) the service is verified by the resort, in a form and manner prescribed by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, to be incidental to the supplier's primary resort business, as evidenced by the gross annual revenues derived from each type of service 20260HB2596PN3522 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided to independently owned user premises being less than 1% of the annual gross revenues of the primary resort business;(III) rates to independently owned user premises do not exceed the average of the rates for comparable service provided by two municipal corporations or municipal authorities or any combination of the two that are reasonably proximate to the resort or within the same county if rural;(IV) service will not be terminated to any independently owned user premises in the resort, unless termination is requested by the user, if necessary due to nonpayment or to prevent misuse of the system by a user that impairs or jeopardizes service to other users and the resort or if termination is directed by law, regulation or by a Federal or State agency or governmental body;(V) the water and sewer service provided to the independently owned user premises is the same service that the resort owner provides to themselves or their affiliates;(VI) the resort adopts a resolution providing that it will not serve any additional independently owned user premises except if lawfully directed by any Federal or State agency or governmental body to protect public health and safety due to an emergency such as contamination or failure of existing supply and does not revoke 20260HB2596PN3522 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or amend the resolution without first notifying the Secretary of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission in writing 30 days in advance of the proposed revocation or amendment; and(VII) disputes between an independently owned user premises and the resort are resolved by the applicable court system.(B) For purposes of this subparagraph:(I) The term "resort" means a place or business visited primarily for leisure or vacation that offers or provides lodging, entertainment, hospitality, dining, recreational facilities or activities for guests, business conferees, members or residents.(II) The term "independently owned user premises" means a structure not owned by the resort or its affiliates, including a structure intended to be used as a seasonal residence, served from a point within the boundaries of a resort and to which a resort owner or their affiliates provide water or sewer service.(3) For the purposes of 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2702 (relating to construction, relocation, suspension and abolition of crossings), 2703 (relating to ejectment in crossing cases) and 2704 (relating to compensation for damages occasioned by construction, relocation or abolition of crossings), and those portions of 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 1501 (relating to character of service and facilities), 1505 (relating to proper service and facilities established on complaint; authority to order conservation and load management programs) and 1508 (relating 20260HB2596PN3522 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to reports of accidents), as those sections or portions relate to safety only, the term includes a municipal authority or transportation authority organized under the laws of this Commonwealth when it owns or operates, for the carriage of passengers or goods by rail, a line of railroad composed of lines formerly owned or operated by the Pennsylvania Railroad, the Penn-Central Transportation Company, the Reading Company or the Consolidated Rail Corporation.Section 3. Public utility payments reported to credit reporting agencies.(a) Option.--A public utility shall provide customers the opportunity to opt into and, at any time, to opt out of having the public utility payments of the customers reported to a nationwide credit reporting agency.(b) New customers.--A person who becomes a customer of a public utility after the effective date of this subsection shall be notified by the public utility of the opportunity to opt into and, at any time, to opt out of having the customer's payments reported to credit reporting agencies when establishing the customer's public utility account with the public utility.(c) Existing customers.--A person who is a customer of a public utility on the effective date of this subsection shall be notified in writing by the public utility of the opportunity to opt into and, at any time, to opt out of having the customer's payments reported to credit reporting agencies within 45 days of the effective date of this subsection.(d) Time limit to opt in.--(1) New and existing public utility customers may register to opt into and opt out of public utility payment 20260HB2596PN3522 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credit reporting at any time after notification of the availability of the option.(2) A public utility may not set a time limit or expiration date on the credit reporting option nor may the option be rescinded at any time in the future.(e) Costs and fees.--A public utility may not pass on costs or charge a fee to a consumer who chooses to opt into or opt out of the credit reporting under this section.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2596PN3522 - 7 - 12345678910